Hawaii statutes.
[§269E-16] Reconsideration and rehearings.
After any order or decision has been made by the public utilities commission,
any party to the proceeding may apply once for reconsideration or a rehearing
in respect to any matter determined in the proceeding and specified in the
motion for reconsideration or rehearing. The motion for reconsideration or a
rehearing shall be filed within ten days after the decision and order has been
served and shall set forth specifically the ground or grounds on which the applicant
considers the decision or order to be unlawful. No person shall in any court
urge or rely on any ground not so set forth in the motion. A motion for
reconsideration or rehearing shall not excuse any person from complying with
and obeying any order or decision, or any requirement of any order or decision
of the commission theretofore made, or operate in any manner to stay or
postpone the enforcement thereof, except in such cases and upon such terms as
the commission by order directs. If, after reconsideration or rehearing the
commission is of the opinion that the original order or decision, or any part
thereof, is in any respect unjust or unwarranted, or should be changed, the
commission may abrogate, change, or modify it. The order or decision abrogating,
changing, or modifying the original order or decision shall have the same force
and effect as an original order or decision, but shall not affect any right or
the enforcement of any right arising from or by virtue of the original order or
decision unless so ordered by the commission. [L 2004, c 141, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next